Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202581-1612
Rules and regulations.

The Director of Water, Energy, and Environment may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations for implementation and administration of sections 81-1608 to 81-1626. Rules, regulations, or amendments thereto shall be adopted pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 1980, LB 954, § 36;

Laws 1981, LB 2, § 1;

Laws 1983, LB 124, § 13;

Laws 2000, LB 1135, § 27;

Laws 2019, LB302, § 160;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 454.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.